Wisconsin, session 2025, AB501.
do enact as follows:AB501,11Section 1. 36.41 of the statutes is created to read:AB501,2,3236.41 Campus free speech and academic freedom. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:AB501,3,24(a) “Employee” means a member of the faculty, academic staff, or university 1staff assigned to an institution. “Employee” also includes the institution’s graduate 2assistants and employees in training.AB501,3,43(b) 1. “Virtual space” means a forum utilizing electronic technology that 4satisfies all of the following:AB501,3,85a. It enables participants who are not in each other’s physical presence to 6communicate with each other simultaneously by sight and sound to conduct a 7meeting or gathering, have a discussion, hold an event, or otherwise convey 8information and ideas with each other in real time.AB501,3,109b. It is under the control or supervision of the institution or is being used for 10an institution-authorized purpose or activity.AB501,3,12112. “Virtual space” does not include a virtual classroom while it is in use for 12instructional purposes.AB501,3,1613(2) Principles of academic freedom and freedom of expression. (a) The 14system and each institution shall adhere to the following principles of academic 15freedom and freedom of expression in order to achieve the system’s mission under s. 1636.01 (2):AB501,4,3171. Academic freedom includes the freedom to explore all avenues of 18scholarship, research, and creative expression, and to reach conclusions according 19to one’s own scholarly discernment. Freedom of expression includes the right to 20discuss and present scholarly opinions and conclusions on all matters both in and 21outside the classroom. These freedoms include the right to speak and write as a 22member of an institution’s community or as a private citizen without institutional 23discipline or restraint on scholarly matters or on matters of public concern. The 1system and each institution shall remain committed to these principles and provide 2all members of an institution’s community the broadest possible latitude to explore 3ideas and to speak, write, listen, challenge, and learn.AB501,4,1042. Although different ideas in an institution’s community often and quite 5naturally conflict, it is not the proper role of an institution to attempt to shield 6individuals from ideas and opinions the institution or others find unwelcome, 7disagreeable, or even deeply offensive. Despite the great value of civility, concerns 8about civility and mutual respect may never be used as justification for closing off 9discussion of ideas, however offensive or disagreeable those ideas may be to some 10members within an institution’s community.AB501,4,23113. The freedom to debate and discuss the merits of competing ideas does not 12mean that members of an institution’s community may say whatever they wish, 13wherever they wish. Consistent with long-standing practice informed by law, the 14system and each institution may restrict expression that violates the law, that 15falsely defames a specific individual, that constitutes a genuine threat or 16discriminatory harassment, that unjustifiably invades substantial privacy or 17confidentiality interests, or that is otherwise directly incompatible with the 18functioning of an institution. In addition, subject to sub. (3) (a) 2., the system and 19each institution may reasonably regulate the time, place, and manner of expression 20to ensure that it does not disrupt ordinary activities. However, these exceptions to 21the general principle of freedom of expression shall be construed narrowly and may 22not be applied in a manner that is inconsistent with the system’s and each 23institution’s commitment to a completely free and open discussion of ideas.AB501,5,11(b) The principles stated in par. (a) carry responsibilities, as follows:AB501,5,821. Academic freedom carries the responsibility for the faithful performance of 3professional duties and obligations. All members of an institution’s community 4share in the responsibility for maintaining civility and a climate of mutual respect. 5Although members of an institution’s community are free to criticize and contest 6the views expressed on campus, they may not obstruct or otherwise interfere with 7the freedom of others, including speakers who are invited to campus, to express 8views they reject or even loathe.AB501,5,1192. Freedom of expression carries the obligation to make clear that when 10speaking on matters of public interest or concern, one is speaking on behalf of 11oneself, not the institution.AB501,5,23123. An institution has a solemn responsibility not only to promote lively and 13fearless exploration, deliberation, and debate of ideas, but also to protect those 14freedoms when others attempt to restrict them. Exploration, deliberation, and 15debate may not be suppressed because the ideas put forth are thought by some or 16even by most members of an institution’s community, or those outside the 17community, to be offensive, unwise, immoral, or wrongheaded. It is for the 18members of an institution’s community, not for the institution itself, to make those 19judgments for themselves, and to act on those judgments not by seeking to suppress 20exploration of ideas or expression of speech, but by openly and vigorously contesting 21the ideas that they oppose. Fostering the ability of members of an institution’s 22community to engage in such debate and deliberation in an effective and 23responsible manner is an essential part of an institution’s educational mission.AB501,6,21(3) First Amendment protections. (a) Except as specified in this section, 2an institution may not do any of the following:AB501,6,1031. Restrict speech protected under the First Amendment of the U.S. 4Constitution, including noncommercial expressive activities protected under the 5provisions of this section, which include all forms of peaceful assembly, protests, 6speeches, distribution of literature, carrying signs, circulating petitions, and the 7recording and lawful publication, including Internet publication, of video and audio 8lawfully recorded in public outdoor areas of the institution or public virtual spaces, 9if the speaker’s conduct is not unlawful and does not materially and substantially 10disrupt the functioning of the institution.AB501,6,15112. Maintain and enforce time, place, and manner restrictions on expressive 12activities on the open outdoor areas of its campus that are generally accessible to 13the public and indoor areas and virtual spaces that have been designated as public 14forums, except classrooms while they are in use for instructional purposes, unless 15those restrictions meet all of the following requirements:AB501,6,1816a. The restrictions are reasonable, in furtherance of a significant institutional 17interest, and employ clear, published, content-neutral, and viewpoint-neutral 18criteria.AB501,6,2119b. The restrictions provide for ample alternative means for communication of 20the information and allow for members of the institution’s community to 21spontaneously and contemporaneously distribute literature and assemble.AB501,7,2223. Designate any area of a campus a “free speech zone” or otherwise create 1policies restricting noncommercial expressive activities to a particular area of a 2campus.AB501,7,834. Require a permit from any individual or group as a condition of being 4allowed to engage in expressive activities protected under this section, unless the 5individual or group is seeking exclusive control of a location for its expressive 6activity at a reserved time. Any such permitting process may not be overly 7burdensome, and applications for permits shall be evaluated solely using published 8content and viewpoint-neutral criteria.AB501,7,1995. Charge security fees to a student or a student group, as part of an 10application for those expressive activities that require a permit, based on the 11content of the expression, the content of the expression of an invited guest, or the 12anticipated reaction to the student’s, student group’s, or invited guest’s expression. 13Whether the security fee is required and its amount may be determined only on the 14basis of content and viewpoint-neutral criteria. Content and viewpoint-neutral 15criteria include the time of the event, the location of the event, the anticipated size 16of the invited audience, and whether alcohol will be served. Any institution 17charging security fees pursuant to this subdivision shall publish the criteria it uses 18for assessing those charges and shall have a published process for waving the fees 19for those who cannot afford to pay them.AB501,8,3206. Sanction individuals or groups for discriminatory harassment unless the 21speech targets its victim on the basis of the victim’s membership in a class 22protected under federal, state, or local law, and is so severe, pervasive, and 23objectively offensive that it effectively bars a student from receiving equal access to 1educational opportunities or benefits. This subdivision does not preclude an 2institution from providing additional resources to a student affected by speech that 3cannot be sanctioned under this subdivision or from taking nonpunitive actions.AB501,8,84(b) All indoor areas and virtual spaces that have been designated as public 5forums and outdoor public areas generally accessible to the public and operated by 6an institution or under the institution’s jurisdiction, except classrooms while they 7are in use for instructional purposes, shall be governed by rules applicable to 8traditional public forums.AB501,8,129(c) 1. Nothing in this section enables individuals to engage in conduct that 10intentionally, materially, and substantially disrupts another’s expressive activity if 11that activity is occurring in a campus space, including a virtual space, reserved for 12that activity under the exclusive use or control of a particular group.AB501,8,17132. For purposes of subd. 1., and subject to subd. 3., “materially and 14substantially disrupts” means when a person, with the intent or knowledge of doing 15so, significantly hinders another person’s or group’s expressive activity, prevents 16the communication of the message, or prevents the transaction of the business of a 17lawful meeting, gathering, or procession by doing any of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab501 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab501 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB501 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB501 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB501: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting